bg-BG: Размер на високоговорителя: 10 инча; 3,5 инча; 4 инча; 5,25 инча; 6 инча; 6,5 инча; 6x8 инча; 6x9 инча; 8 инча; Друго
vi: Kích thước loa: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 5,25 in; 6 in; 6,5 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 8 in; Khác
sk-SK: Veľkosť reproduktora: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 5,25 in; 6 in; 6,5 in; 6 × 8 in; 6 × 9 in; 8 in; Iná
ko: 스피커 크기: 10인치; 3.5인치; 4인치; 5.25인치; 6인치; 6.5인치; 6x8인치; 6x9인치; 8인치; 기타
sv: Högtalarstorlek: 10 tum; 3,5 tum; 4 tum; 5,25 tum; 6 tum; 6,5 tum; 6x8 tum; 6x9 tum; 8 tum; Annat
pl: Rozmiar głośnika: 10 cali; 3,5 cala; 4 cale; 5,25 cala; 6 cali; 6,5 cala; 6x8 cali; 6x9 cali; 8 cali; Inne
en: Speaker size: 10 in; 3.5 in; 4 in; 5.25 in; 6 in; 6.5 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 8 in; Other
fr: Taille du haut-parleur: 10 po; 3,5 po; 4 po; 5,25 po; 6 po; 6,5 po; 6x8 po; 6x9 po; 8 po; Autre
pt-BR: Tamanho do alto-falante: 10 pol.; 3,5 pol.; 4 pol.; 5,25 pol.; 6 pol.; 6,5 pol.; 6x8 pol.; 6x9 pol.; 8 pol.; Outros
fi: Kaiuttimen koko: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 5,25 in; 6 in; 6,5 in; 6 × 8 in; 6 × 9 in; 8 in; Muu
sl-SI: Velikost zvočnika: 10 inčev; 3,5 inča; 4 inči; 5,25 inča; 6 inčev; 6,5 inča; 6 x 8 inčev; 6 x 9 inčev; 8 inčev; Drugo
da: Højttalerstørrelse: 10 tommer; 3,5 tommer; 4 tommer; 5,25 tommer; 6 tommer; 6,5 tommer; 6x8 tommer; 6x9 tommer; 8 tommer; Andet
th: ขนาดลำโพง: 10 นิ้ว; 3.5 นิ้ว; 4 นิ้ว; 5.25 นิ้ว; 6 นิ้ว; 6.5 นิ้ว; 6x8 นิ้ว; 6x9 นิ้ว; 8 นิ้ว; อื่นๆ
it: Taglia dell'altoparlante: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 5,25 in; 6 in; 6,5 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 8 in; Altro
zh-CN: 音箱尺寸: 10 英寸; 3.5 英寸; 4 英寸; 5.25 英寸; 6 英寸; 6.5 英寸; 6x8 英寸; 6x9 英寸; 8 英寸; 其他
pt-PT: Tamanho do altifalante: 10 pol.; 3,5 pol.; 4 pol.; 5,25 pol.; 6 pol.; 6,5 pol.; 6x8 pol.; 6x9 pol.; 8 pol.; Outro
hu: Hangszóró mérete: 10 hüvelyk; 3,5 hüvelyk; 4 hüvelyk; 5,25 hüvelyk; 6 hüvelyk; 6,5 hüvelyk; 6x8 hüvelyk; 6x9 hüvelyk; 8 hüvelyk; Egyéb
tr: Hoparlör boyutu: 10 inç; 3,5 inç; 4 inç; 5,25 inç; 6 inç; 6,5 inç; 6x8 inç; 6x9 inç; 8 inç; Diğer
zh-TW: 揚聲器尺寸: 10 吋; 3.5 吋; 4 吋; 5.25 吋; 6 吋; 6.5 吋; 6x8 吋; 6x9 吋; 8 吋; 其他
el: Μέγεθος ηχείου: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 5,25 in; 6 in; 6,5 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 8 in; Άλλο
lt-LT: Garsiakalbių dydis: 10 col.; 3,5 col.; 4 col.; 5,25 col.; 6 col.; 6,5 col.; 6x8 col.; 6x9 col.; 8 col.; Kita
nl: Luidspreker maat: 10 inch; 3,5 inch; 4 inch; 5,25 inch; 6 inch; 6,5 inch; 6x8 inch; 6x9 inch; 8 inch; Overige
de: Lautsprechergröße: 10 Zoll; 3,5 Zoll; 4 Zoll; 5,25 Zoll; 6 Zoll; 6,5 Zoll; 6x8 Zoll; 6x9 Zoll; 8 Zoll; Sonstige
es: Tamaño del altavoz: 10 pulg.; 3,5 pulg.; 4 pulg.; 5,25 pulg.; 6 pulg.; 6,5 pulg.; 6x8 pulg.; 6x9 pulg.; 8 pulg.; Otro
nb: Høyttalerstørrelse: 10 tommer; 3,5 tommer; 4 tommer; 5,25 tommer; 6 tommer; 6,5 tommer; 6x8 tommer; 6x9 tommer; 8 tommer; Annet
ja: スピーカーサイズ: 10 インチ; 3.5 インチ; 4 インチ; 5.25 インチ; 6 インチ; 6.5 インチ; 6x8 インチ; 6x9 インチ; 8 インチ; その他
cs: Velikost reproduktoru: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 5,25 in; 6 in; 6,5 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 8 in; Jiné
ru: Размер динамика: 10 дюймов; 3,5 дюйма; 4 дюйма; 5,25 дюйма; 6 дюймов; 6,5 дюйма; 6x8 дюймов; 6x9 дюймов; 8 дюймов; Другое
ro-RO: Dimensiunea difuzorului: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 5,25 in; 6 in; 6,5 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 8 in; Altele
hr-HR: Veličina zvučnika: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 5,25 in; 6 in; 6,5 in; 6 x 8 in; 6 x 9 in; 8 in; Ostalo